Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Article 4. Forms, Records, and Reports.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Marriage, §§ 31-37.

55 C.J.S., Marriage, § 35.

Sec. 25.05.191.
Marriage license application.

A licensing officer shall make available an application for a marriage license for completion by the parties who wish to be married. The officer shall keep the completed applications, a record of licenses issued, and all other information that the officer is required by law to obtain. These records shall be kept in the office of the licensing officer and shall be open for public inspection or examination during normal office hours.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 3 ch 28 SLA 1975; am § 5 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Administrative Code. —

For births, deaths, burial permits, marriages, divorces, adoptions, see 7 AAC 5, art. 2.

Sec. 25.05.200.
Marriage in violation of statute. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.201.
Notes on docket. [Repealed, § 4 ch 134 SLA 1984.]

Sec. 25.05.210.
Solemnization by de facto minister or judicial officer or according to established ritual valid. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.211.
Reports by marriage commissioner. [Repealed, § 13 ch 79 SLA 1997.]

Sec. 25.05.220.
Who may solemnize. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.221.
Forms.

Forms for application, statements, consent of parents, affidavits, licenses, and other forms necessary to comply with this chapter shall be prescribed by the registrar and provided at the expense of the state. The registrar shall furnish all necessary forms to each licensing officer.

The registrar shall supervise the record work and required reporting of the licensing officers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 7 ch 103 SLA 1971; am § 2 ch 134 SLA 1984; am § 6 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Sec. 25.05.230.
Form or manner of solemnization. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.231.
Reports of licenses issued.

The registrar may require reports of licenses issued upon forms to be furnished by the registrar.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963)

Sec. 25.05.240.
Parties to receive copy of certificate. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.241.
Fees.

The registrar shall establish marriage license fees and provide for accounting for and disposing of the fees.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 7 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Cross references. —

For court rule setting fees related to marriage, see Alaska Rules of Administration, Rule 9(e)(7) and (8).

Sec. 25.05.250.
Unlawful solemnization of marriage. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]

Sec. 25.05.251.
Relationship to Vital Statistics Act.

Nothing in this chapter repeals or abrogates any part of AS 18.50 (Vital Statistics Act). The records and requirements leading up to and including the issuance of the marriage license are included in the definition of “vital statistics” under AS 18.50. The registrar shall supply the necessary forms and instructions for the licensing officers.

History.

(§ 1 ch 58 SLA 1963; am § 8 ch 79 SLA 1997)

Sec. 25.05.260.
Solemnization by unauthorized person. [Repealed, § 2 ch 58 SLA 1963.]